Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-316 Actions on officers' salaries.
No action to recover, or no action on account of, any salary or other
compensation due or claimed to be due any officer or director of a domestic
mutual insurer, or on any note or agreement relative thereto, shall be brought
against the insurer later than twelve months after the date on which the salary
or compensation, or any installment thereof, first accrued. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next